Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-933
Confined person; person in legal custody of Department
of Correctional Services; dangerous sex offender; offenses against
another person; penalty; sentence.

(1) Any person (a)(i) who is legally confined
in a jail or an adult correctional
or penal institution, (ii)
who is otherwise in legal custody of the Department of Correctional Services,
or (iii) who is committed as a dangerous sex offender under the Sex Offender
Commitment Act and (b) who
commits (i) assault in the first,
second, or third degree as defined in sections 28-308 to 28-310, (ii) terroristic threats as defined in section
28-311.01, (iii) kidnapping as defined
in section 28-313, or (iv) false imprisonment in
the first or second degree as defined in sections 28-314 and 28-315, against
any person for the purpose of compelling or inducing the performance of any
act by such person or any other person shall be guilty of a Class II felony.

(2) Sentences imposed under subsection (1) of this section
shall be served consecutive to any sentence or sentences imposed for violations
committed prior to the violation of subsection (1) of this section and shall
not include any credit for time spent in custody prior to sentencing unless
the time in custody is solely related to the offense for which the sentence
is being imposed under this section.

Laws 1982, LB 465, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 13;

Laws 2010, LB771, § 9.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.